Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Children in Need of Supervision Act
§ 14-6-419.
Physical and mental examinations.

Any time after the filing of a petition, on motion of the district attorney or the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney or on motion of the court, the court may order the child to be examined by a licensed and qualified physician, surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist or licensed mental health professional designated by the court to aid in determining the physical and mental condition of the child. The examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis, but the court may commit the child to a suitable medical facility or institution for examination if deemed necessary. Commitment for examination shall not exceed fifteen (15) days. Any time after the filing of a petition, the court on its own motion or on motion of the district attorney or the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney, may order the child’s parents, guardians or other custodial members of the child’s family to undergo a substance abuse assessment at the expense of the child’s parents, guardians or other custodial members of the child’s family and to fully comply with all findings and recommendations set forth in the assessment. Failure to comply may result in contempt proceedings as set forth in W.S.

14-6-438

.

If a child has been committed to a medical facility or institution for mental examination prior to adjudication of the petition and if it appears to the court from the mental examination that the child is competent to participate in further proceedings and is not mentally ill or intellectually disabled to a degree rendering the child subject to involuntary commitment to a residential treatment facility, the court shall order the child returned to the court without delay.

If it appears to the court by mental examination conducted before adjudication of the petition that a child alleged to be in need of supervision is incompetent to participate in further proceedings by reason of mental illness or intellectual disability to a degree rendering the child subject to involuntary commitment to a residential treatment facility, the court shall hold further proceedings under this act in abeyance. The district attorney shall then commence proceedings in the district court for commitment of the child to the appropriate institution as provided by law.

The juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction of the child on the petition pending final determination of the commitment proceedings in the district court. If proceedings in the district court commit the child to a facility or institution for treatment and care of people with mental illness or intellectual disability, the petition shall be dismissed and further proceedings under this act terminate. If proceedings in the district court determine the child does not have a mental illness or an intellectual disability to a degree rendering him subject to involuntary commitment, the court shall proceed to a final adjudication of the petition and disposition of the child under the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 2; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “mentally ill or intellectually disabled” for “suffering from mental illness or mental retardation” or similar language in (b), (c) and (d).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” in (b) through (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “a residential treatment facility” for “the Wyoming state hospital or the Wyoming life resource center” in (b) and (c); and in (d) substituted “a facility:” for “the Wyoming state hospital, the Wyoming life resource center or any other facility.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-420.
Emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment.

The court may authorize and consent to emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment of a child taken into custody under the provisions of this act either before or after the filing of a petition, if in the opinion of a licensed and qualified physician or surgeon the child is suffering from a serious physical condition or illness which requires prompt treatment or prompt examination is necessary to preserve evidence of neglect.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-421.
Reports of medical or mental examinations; use of results; copies.

The results of any medical or mental examination authorized or ordered by the court shall be reported to the court in writing and signed by the person making the examination. The results may not be considered by the court prior to adjudication but may be considered only in making a disposition under this act. Copies of the examination reports shall be made available to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney upon request.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-422.
Advising of right to counsel required; appointment of counsel; verification of financial condition.

At their first appearance before the court the child and his parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of the child’s right to be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings including appeal, and to employ counsel of their own choice.

The court shall upon request appoint counsel to represent the child if the child, his parents, guardian or custodian are unable to obtain counsel. If appointment of counsel is requested, the court shall require the child and his parents, guardian or custodian to verify their financial condition under oath, either by written affidavit signed and sworn to by the parties or by sworn testimony made a part of the record of the proceedings. The affidavit or sworn testimony shall state they are without sufficient money, property, assets or credit to employ counsel. The court may require further verification of financial condition if it deems necessary. If the child requests counsel and his parents, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s support is able but unwilling to obtain counsel for the child, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the child and may direct reimbursement of counsel fees under W.S.

14-6-434

.

The court may appoint counsel for any party when necessary in the interest of justice.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-423.
Rights of parties generally; demand for and conduct of jury trial.

A party to any proceeding under this act is entitled to:

A copy of all charges made against him;

Confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses;

Introduce evidence, present witnesses and otherwise be heard in his own behalf; and

Issue of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses or the production of evidence.

A party against whom a petition has been filed or the district attorney may demand a trial by jury at an adjudicatory hearing. The jury shall be composed of jurors selected, qualified and compensated as provided by law for the trial of civil matters in the district court. The jury may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list residing within five (5) miles of the city or town where the trial is to be held, whichever the court directs. Demand for a jury trial must be made to the court not later than ten (10) days after the party making the demand is advised of his right to a jury trial. No deposit for jury fees is required. Failure of a party to demand a jury is a waiver of this right.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list residing” for “drawn from the jury panel of the district court or a special jury panel may be drawn from ‘jury box number three (3)’ containing the names of persons” in the third sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-424.
Conduct of hearings generally; exclusion of general public and child; exceptions; consolidations permitted.

Unless a jury trial is demanded, hearings under this act shall be conducted by the court without a jury in an informal but orderly manner and separate from other proceedings not included under this act. The district attorney shall present evidence in support of the petition and otherwise represent the state. If the allegations in the petition are denied, adjudicatory and disposition hearings shall be recorded by the court reporter or by electronic, mechanical or other appropriate means.

Except in hearings to declare a person in contempt of court, the general public are excluded from hearings under this act. Only the parties, counsel for the parties, jurors, witnesses, and other persons the court finds having a proper interest in the proceedings or in the work of the court shall be admitted. If the court finds it necessary in the best interest of the child, the child may be temporarily excluded from any hearing except while evidence is being received at an adjudicatory hearing in support of the allegations of his need for supervision.

Hearings on two (2) or more petitions may be consolidated for purposes of adjudication when the allegations in the petitions pertain to the same act constituting the alleged need for supervision. Separate hearings on the petitions may be held thereafter for purposes of disposition.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed former (d), pertaining to continuances and deferrals.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Cited in

LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-6-425.
Burden of proof required; verdict of jury; effect thereof.

Allegations that a child is in need of supervision must be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.

If trial by jury is demanded, the jury shall decide issues of fact raised by the petition and return its verdict as to the truth of the allegations contained in the petition. A finding by the jury that the allegations are true is a determination that judicial intervention is necessary for the best interest and welfare of the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-426.
Initial appearance; adjudicatory hearing; entry of decree and disposition; evidentiary matters; continuance of disposition hearing.

At their initial hearing, which may be held after a detention or shelter care hearing, the child and his parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of their rights under law and as provided in this act. They shall also be advised of the specific allegations in the petition and the child shall be given an opportunity to admit or deny them. They shall also be advised of the possible liability for costs of treatment or services pursuant to this act. It is not necessary at the initial appearance for the district attorney to establish probable cause to believe the allegations in the petition are true. When a detention or shelter care hearing is held in accordance with W.S.

14-6-409

, a separate initial hearing is not required if the child and his parents, guardian or custodian were present at the detention or shelter care hearing and advised by the court as provided in this subsection.

If the allegations of the petition are denied, the court may, with consent of the parties, proceed immediately to hear evidence on the petition or it may set a later time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed. Only competent, relevant and material evidence shall be admissible at an adjudicatory hearing to determine the truth of the allegations in the petition. If after an adjudicatory hearing the court finds that the allegations in the petition are not established as required by this act, it shall dismiss the petition and order the child released from any detention or shelter care.

If after an adjudicatory hearing or a valid admission or confession the court or jury finds that a child is in need of supervision, it shall enter a decree to that effect stating the jurisdictional facts upon which the decree is based. It may then proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing within sixty (60) days to make proper disposition of the child, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing.

In detention or shelter care hearings or disposition hearings, all material and relevant evidence helpful in determining questions may be received by the court and relied upon for probative value. The parties or their counsel may examine and controvert written reports received as evidence and cross-examine persons making the reports.

On motion of any party or on its own motion, the court may continue a disposition hearing for a reasonable time not to exceed sixty (60) days to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition to be made. The court shall make an appropriate order for detention or shelter care of the child or for his release from detention or shelter care subject to any terms and conditions the court deems necessary during the period of continuance.

At any time prior to disposition under W.S.

14-6-429

, the court, on motion of any party or on its own motion, may reconsider its order regarding detention or shelter care or conditions of release made under W.S.

14-6-409

or

14-6-414

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b) and (c), inserted “unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing” at the end of the first and second sentences, respectively; and also in (b) added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-427.
Predisposition studies and reports.

After a petition is filed alleging the child is in need of supervision, the court shall order the department of family services to make a predisposition study and report. The court shall establish a deadline for completion of the report. While preparing the study the department shall consult with the child’s school and school district to determine the child’s educational needs. The study and report shall also cover:

The social history, environment and present condition of the child and his family;

The performance of the child in school, including whether the child receives special education services and how his goals and objectives might be impacted by the court’s disposition, provided the school receives authorization to share the information;

The presence of child abuse and neglect or domestic violence histories, past acts of violence, learning disabilities, cognitive disabilities or physical impairments and the necessary services to accommodate the disabilities and impairments;

The presence of any mental health or substance abuse risk factors, including current participation in counseling, therapy or treatment; and

Other matters relevant to treatment of the child, including any pertinent family information, or proper disposition of the case, including any information required by W.S. 21-13-315(d).

Within ten (10) days after a petition is filed alleging a child is in need of supervision, the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary team. Upon motion by a party, the court may add or dismiss a member of the multidisciplinary team.

The multidisciplinary team shall include the following:

The child’s parent, parents or guardian;

A representative of the school district who has direct knowledge of the child and, if the child receives special education, is a member of the child’s individualized education plan team;

A representative of the department of family services;

The child’s psychiatrist, psychologist or mental health professional;

The district attorney or his designee;

The child’s attorney or guardian ad litem, if one is appointed by the court;

The volunteer lay advocate, if one is appointed by the court; and

The foster parent.

In addition to the persons listed in subsection (c) of this section, the court may appoint one (1) or more of the following persons to the multidisciplinary team:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

The child;

A relative;

If the predispositional study indicates a parent or child has special needs, an appropriate representative of the department of health’s substance abuse, mental health or developmental disabilities division who has knowledge of the services available in the state’s system of care that are pertinent to those identified needs;

Other professionals or persons who have particular knowledge relating to the child or his family, or expertise in children’s services and the child’s or parent’s specific disability or special needs, including linguistic and cultural needs.

Before the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the department of family services shall provide each member of the multidisciplinary team with a brief summary of the case detailing the allegations in the petition that have been adjudicated, if any. The multidisciplinary team shall, as quickly as reasonably possible, review the child’s personal and family history, school, mental health and department of family services records and any other pertinent information, for the purpose of making case planning recommendations. The team shall involve the child in the development of recommendations to the extent appropriate.

At the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the team shall formulate reasonable and attainable recommendations for the court outlining the goals or objectives the parents should be required to meet for the child to be returned to the home or for the case to be closed. At each subsequent meeting, the multidisciplinary team shall review the progress of the parents and the child, and shall reevaluate the plan ordered by the court. For cause, which shall be set forth with specificity, the multidisciplinary team may adjust its recommendations to the court with respect to the goals or objectives in the plan to effect the return of the child to the home or to close the case, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. In formulating recommendations, the multidisciplinary team shall give consideration to the best interest of the child, the best interest of the family, the most appropriate and least restrictive case planning options available as well as costs of care. After each multidisciplinary team meeting, the coordinator shall prepare for submission to each member of the team and to the court a summary of the multidisciplinary team meeting specifically describing the recommendations for the court and the goals and objectives which should be met to return the child to the home or to close the case, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. If the recommendations for the case plan have been changed, the summary shall include a detailed explanation of the change in the recommendations and the reasons for the change.

All records, reports and case planning recommendations of the multidisciplinary team are confidential except as provided by this section. Any person who willfully violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

The court shall not consider any report or recommendation under this section prior to adjudication of the allegations in the petition without the consent of the child and the child’s parents, guardian or custodian.

Any member of a multidisciplinary team who cannot attend team meetings in person or by telephone may submit written reports and recommendations to the other team members and to the court. Individuals who are not members of the multidisciplinary team but have knowledge pertinent to the team’s decisions may be asked to provide information to the multidisciplinary team. The individuals shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of subsection (g) of this section.

The department shall develop a case plan for a juvenile when there is a recommendation to place the child outside the home.

If the child is placed outside the home, the multidisciplinary team shall meet quarterly to review the child’s and the family’s progress toward meeting the goals or expectations in the case plan and the multidisciplinary team shall provide a written report with recommendations to the court prior to each review hearing.

No later than five (5) business days prior to the dispositional hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court the multidisciplinary team report which shall include the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan in a standard format established by the department.

Five (5) business days prior to each review hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court a report updating the multidisciplinary team report, the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, in part modifying duties, changing membership of the multidisciplinary team, and adding procedural provisions.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (c)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2009, in (e), added the first sentence, and in (f), added the first through third, and fifth and sixth sentences.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides that: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 14-6-428.
Abeyance of proceedings by consent decree; term of decree; reinstatement of proceedings; effect of discharge or completing term.

At any time after the filing of a petition alleging a child to be in need of supervision and before adjudication, the court may issue a consent decree ordering further proceedings held in abeyance and place a child in need of supervision under the supervision of the department of family services or any other qualified person the court may designate. The placement of the child is subject to the terms, conditions and stipulations agreed to by the parties affected. The consent decree shall not be entered without the consent of the district attorney, the child’s legal representative, where applicable, and the child and the notification of the parents. Modifications to an existing consent decree may be allowed.

The consent decree agreement shall be in writing and copies given to each of the parties. It shall include the case plan for the child or his family.

A consent decree shall be in force for the period agreed upon by the parties but not longer than one (1) year unless sooner terminated by the court. If prior to discharge by the court or expiration of the consent decree, a child alleged to be in need of supervision fails to fulfill the terms and conditions of the decree or a new petition is filed alleging the child to be in need of supervision because of misconduct occurring during the term of the consent decree, the original petition and proceedings may be reinstated upon order of the court after hearing and the matter may proceed as though the consent decree had never been entered. If, as part of the consent decree, the child made an admission to any of the allegations contained in the original petition, that admission shall be entered only if the court orders that the original petition and proceeding be reinstated and the admissions, if any, be entered. If the admission is entered, the court may proceed to disposition pursuant to W.S.

14-6-426

.

If a consent decree is in effect and the child is in placement, the court shall hold a six (6) month review and twelve (12) month review as provided under W.S.

14-6-429

.

A child discharged by the court under a consent decree without reinstatement of the original petition and proceeding shall not thereafter be proceeded against in any court for the same misconduct alleged in the original petition.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “the child's legal representative, where applicable” following “without the consent of the district attorney” and added the last sentence; added (b); redesignated and rewrote former (b) as (c); added (d); and redesignated former (c) as (e), substituting “A child discharged by the court” for “If the child completes the period of supervision,” inserting “and proceeding” and making related changes.